Wisconsin, session 2025, AB624.
do enact as follows:AB624,11Section 1. 961.49 (1m) (e) of the statutes is created to read:AB624,2,62961.49 (1m) (e) While the person is in a homeless shelter or while the person 3is on or within 1,000 feet of the premises of a homeless shelter if either the person 4knows or should have known that he or she is on or within 1,000 feet of the premises 5of a homeless shelter or the homeless shelter is readily recognizable as a homeless 6shelter.AB624,27Section 2. 961.49 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB624,2,128961.49 (2m) If any person violates s. 961.65 and, during the violation, the 9person intends to deliver or distribute methamphetamine or a controlled substance 10analog of methamphetamine under any of the circumstances listed under sub. (1m) 11(a), (b), (c), or (d), or (e), the maximum term of imprisonment for that crime is 12increased by 5 years.AB624,2,1313